Utah statutes.
17C-1-506.   Those executing bonds not personally liable -- Limitation of
obligations under bonds -- Negotiability.
(1)  A member of an agency board or other person executing an agency bond is
not liable personally on the bond.
(2) (a)  A bond issued by an agency is not a general obligation or liability
of the community, the state, or any of its political subdivisions and does not
constitute a charge against their general credit or taxing powers.
(b)  A bond issued by an agency is not payable out of any funds or properties
other than those of the agency.
(c)  The community, the state, and its political subdivisions may not be
liable on a bond issued by an agency.
(d)  A bond issued by an agency does not constitute indebtedness within the
meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation.
(3)  A bond issued by an agency under this part is fully negotiable.
